Florida, session 2026, SB942.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âDriver Privacy 16 Act.â 17 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 119.0712, Florida 18 Statutes, is amended to read: 19 119.0712âExecutive branch agency-specific exemptions from 20 inspection or copying of public records.â 21 (2)âDEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.â 22 (a)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 23 1.ââForeign country of concernâ has the same meaning as in 24 s. 692.201. 25 2.ââForeign principalâ has the same meaning as in s. 26 692.201. 27 3.ââMotor vehicle recordâ means any record that pertains to 28 a motor vehicle operatorâs permit, motor vehicle title, motor 29 vehicle registration, or identification card issued by the 30 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles. 31 4.ââPublic-facing portalâ means a web portal or computer 32 application accessible by the public over the Internet, whether 33 through a mobile device, a website, or any other electronic 34 means, which is established for administering chapter 319, 35 chapter 320, chapter 322, chapter 328, or any other provision of 36 law conferring duties upon the department. 37 5.ââSecure login credentialsâ means information held by the 38 department for purposes of authenticating a user logging into a 39 user account on a computer, a computer system, a computer 40 network, or an electronic device; an online user account 41 accessible over the Internet, whether through a mobile device, a 42 website, or any other electronic means; or information used for 43 authentication or password recovery. 44 6.ââThird-party companyâ means any marketing firm, debt 45 collector, insurance company, or data broker. 46 (b)âPersonal information, including highly restricted 47 personal information as defined in 18 U.S.C. s. 2725, contained 48 in a motor vehicle record is confidential pursuant to the 49 federal Driverâs Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. ss. 50 2721 et seq. Such information may be released only as authorized 51 by that act; however, information received pursuant to that act 52 may not be used for mass commercial solicitation of clients for 53 litigation against motor vehicle dealers and may not be sold to 54 or shared with a third-party company, foreign country of 55 concern, or foreign principal. 56 (c)âE-mail addresses collected by the Department of Highway 57 Safety and Motor Vehicles pursuant to s. 319.40(3), s. 58 320.95(2), or s. 322.08(10) are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 59 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution and may not be sold to 60 or shared with a third-party company, foreign country of 61 concern, or foreign principal. This exemption applies 62 retroactively. 63 (d)1.âEmergency contact information contained in a motor 64 vehicle record is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 65 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 66 2.âWithout the express consent of the person to whom such 67 emergency contact information applies, the emergency contact 68 information contained in a motor vehicle record may be released 69 only to: 70 a.âLaw enforcement agencies for purposes of contacting 71 those listed in the event of an emergency. 72 b.âA receiving facility, hospital, or licensed 73 detoxification or addictions receiving facility pursuant to s. 74 394.463(2)(a) or s. 397.6772(1)(a) for the sole purpose of 75 informing a patientâs emergency contacts of the patientâs 76 whereabouts. 77 (e)âAny person or third-party company that who uses or 78 releases any information contained in the Driver and Vehicle 79 Information Database for a purpose not specifically authorized 80 by law commits a noncriminal infraction, punishable by a fine 81 not exceeding $2,000. 82 (f)1.âSecure login credentials held by the Department of 83 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles are exempt from s. 119.07(1) 84 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption 85 applies to secure login credentials held by the department 86 before, on, or after the effective date of the exemption. For 87 purposes of this subparagraph, the term âsecure login 88 credentialsâ means information held by the department for 89 purposes of authenticating a user logging into a user account on 90 a computer, a computer system, a computer network, or an 91 electronic device; an online user account accessible over the 92 Internet, whether through a mobile device, a website, or any 93 other electronic means; or information used for authentication 94 or password recovery. 95 2.âInternet protocol addresses, geolocation data, and other 96 information held by the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 97 Vehicles which describes the location, computer, computer 98 system, or computer network from which a user accesses a public 99 facing portal, and the dates and times that a user accesses a 100 public-facing portal, are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 101 Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption applies to such 102 information held by the department before, on, or after the 103 effective date of the exemption. For purposes of this 104 subparagraph, the term âpublic-facing portalâ means a web portal 105 or computer application accessible by the public over the 106 Internet, whether through a mobile device, website, or other 107 electronic means, which is established for administering chapter 108 319, chapter 320, chapter 322, chapter 328, or any other 109 provision of law conferring duties upon the department. 110 3.âThis paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset 111 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 112 on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 113 through reenactment by the Legislature. 114 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.